North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 23A. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

§ 120-208.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services is established. The Committee consists of 22 members as follows:

Eleven members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party; and

Eleven members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2011-291, s. 1.6(c).

§ 120-208.1.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services shall examine, on a continuing basis, the systemwide issues affecting the development, budgeting, financing, administration, and delivery of health and human services, including issues relating to the governance, accountability, and quality of health and human services delivered to individuals and families in this State. The Committee shall make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve the quality and delivery of services and to maintain a high level of effectiveness and efficiency in system administration at the State and local levels. In conducting its examination, the Committee shall do all of the following:

Study the budgets, programs, and policies of each Division within the Department of Health and Human Services, to determine ways in which the General Assembly may encourage improvement in the budgeting and delivery of health and human services provided to North Carolinians;

Examine, in particular, issues relating to services provided by the following Divisions within the Department of Health and Human Services:

Aging and Adult Services.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-245, s. 16, effective September 23, 2015.

Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

Public Health.

Social Services;

Study other states’ health and human services initiatives, in order to provide an ongoing commentary to the General Assembly on these initiatives and to make recommendations for implementing similar initiatives in North Carolina; and

Study any other health and human services matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

The Committee may make interim reports to the General Assembly on matters for which it may report to a regular session of the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain any legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

2011-291, s. 1.6(c); 2015-245, s. 16.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-245, s. 16, effective September 23, 2015, deleted subdivision (a)(2)b. which read: “Medical Assistance.”

§ 120-208.2.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services. The Committee shall meet at least once per quarter, except while the General Assembly is in regular session, and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is 10 members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

The Committee cochairs may establish subcommittees for the purpose of examining issues relating to services provided by particular Divisions within the Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

2011-291, s. 1.6(c).

§ 120-208.3.
Additional powers.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, while in discharge of official duties, shall have access to any paper or document, and may compel the attendance of any State official or employee before the Committee or secure any evidence under

G.S. 120-19

. In addition,

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

shall apply to the proceedings of the Committee as if it were a joint committee of the General Assembly.

History.

2011-291, s. 1.6(c).

§ 120-208.4.
Reports to Committee.

Whenever a Division within the Department of Health and Human Services is required by law to report to the General Assembly or to any of its permanent, study, or oversight committees or subcommittees on matters affecting that Division, the Department shall transmit a copy of the report to the cochairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services.

Beginning no later than November 1, 2012, and annually thereafter, the Department of Health and Human Services shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on the use of lapsed salary funds by each Division within the Department. For each Division, the report shall include the following information about the preceding State fiscal year:

The total amount of lapsed salary funds.

The number of full-time equivalent positions comprising the lapsed salary funds.

The Fund Code for each full-time equivalent position included in the number reported pursuant to subdivision (2) of this section.

The purposes for which the Department expended lapsed salary funds.

History.

2011-291, s. 1.6(c); 2012-142, s. 10.20; 2013-360, s. 12A.11.